Idaho, session 2025, S1086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 70, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-7045, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-7045. VIOLATION OF LANDOWNER RULES FOR PERMISSIBLE USE. (1) As used
in this section:
(a) "Government entity" means the United States of America and those
entities provided for in section 6-902, Idaho Code.
(b) "Land" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 36-1604,
Idaho Code.
(c) "Notice" means actual notice or constructive notice and includes
posting signs at gates or road or trail entry points onto the land that
state "use restrictions apply" or similar wording and provide a website
address and phone number for contacting the government entity or owner.
(d) "Owner" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 36-1604,
Idaho Code.
(e) "Recreational purposes" shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 36-1604, Idaho Code.
(2) Whenever any government entity that manages or controls land, or
any owner of land, gives notice of and imposes closures, restrictions, regu-
lations, or prohibitions in relation to use of the land for recreational pur-
poses, any person who violates such closures, restrictions, regulations, or
prohibitions shall be guilty of trespass, punishable as provided in section
18-7008(3), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.